Louisiana, session 2026, HB1244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:412(Section heading) and (R) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 32:412(S) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§412. Amount of fees; credit or refund; duration of license; veteran designation;
special needs or accommodation designations; brain injury designation;
disbursement of funds; renewal by mail or electronic commerce of Class "D"
or "E" drivers' licenses; disposition of certain fees; exception
* * *
R.(1) Upon request of an applicant for a driver's license, a designation that
the applicant has a brain injury shall be exhibited on the driver's license upon
presentation of a statement from a qualified medical or mental health professional
licensed in Louisiana or any other state or territory of the United States verifying the
applicant's disability as established by administrative rule. The qualified medical or
mental health professional shall be authorized to diagnose brain injuries. No
additional fee shall be charged to include this designation.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1244 ENROLLED
(2) Upon the renewal of a driver's license, a driver who has a brain injury
shall provide a statement from a qualified medical or mental health professional
licensed in Louisiana or any other state or territory of the United States verifying his
disability as established by administrative rule.
(3) Any person who has not been diagnosed with a brain injury who willfully
and falsely represents himself as having the qualifications to obtain the special
designation authorized by this Subsection shall be fined not less than one hundred
dollars nor more than two hundred fifty dollars, or shall be imprisoned for not more
than thirty days, or both. Any subsequent offense shall result in a fine of not less than
two hundred fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or imprisonment for
not more than ninety days, or both.
(4) In addition to the training requirements contained in R.S. 40:2404.2(C),
the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of Criminal
Justice shall establish and implement law enforcement training relative to law
enforcement officers' interactions with persons with a brain injury. The training shall
instruct law enforcement officers on sensitivity and awareness to ensure equitable
treatment and how to effectively communicate and interact with persons with a brain
injury. At a minimum, the training shall include the following:
(a) Identification of indicators that a person has a brain injury.
(b) Identification of procedures that an officer should employ when
encountering a person with a brain injury.
(c) Demonstrations of communication and interactive techniques required
to effectively interact with a person with a brain injury.
(d) Explanations that provide law enforcement officers with an
understanding of the brain injury and examples of unexpected actions that could
potentially be taken by persons diagnosed with a brain injury.
(e) Explanations of the resources available to assist an officer encountering
a person with a brain injury.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1244 ENROLLED
(f) Descriptions of the procedures an officer should use to ensure compliance
with the Americans with Disabilities Act when encountering a person with a brain
injury.
(5) The deputy secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
public safety services, shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to
implement the provisions of this Subsection, including a waiver of liability for the
release of any medical information. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.
49:966(B)(12), the House and Senate committees on transportation, highways and
public works shall have oversight of the adoption of rules and regulations required
by this Subsection.
R. S. An applicant for any class of license may choose to donate one dollar
in addition to any license fee required by this Section to the Louisiana Military
Family Assistance Fund.
Section 2. This Act shall be known as "Riley's Law".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.